Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 11 Affidavits Affecting Title

Cross references. —

As to admissibility of conveyance or record thereof as evidence, see §

34-1-123

.

As to admissibility of federal land office instruments as evidence, see §

34-1-125

.

§ 34-11-101.
Recorded affidavit as evidence; subjects; facts.

An affidavit stating facts relating to matters which may affect the title to real estate in this state, made by any person having knowledge of the facts and competent to testify concerning them in open court, may be recorded in the office of the county clerk in the county in which the real estate is situated. A certificate of acknowledgement shall not be required on an affidavit containing a jurat in order to be recorded. A recorded affidavit or a certified copy thereof is prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated insofar as the facts affect title to real estate.

The affidavits may relate to the following matters: age, sex, birth, death, relationship, family history, names, identity of parties, marital status, homestead status, possession, occupancy possession, residence, service in the armed forces, conflicts and ambiguities in descriptions of land in recorded instruments, and the happening of any condition or event which may terminate an estate or interest.

The affidavits shall include a description of the land, title to which may be affected by facts stated in the affidavit, and shall state the name of the person appearing by the record to be the owner of the land at the time of the recording of the affidavit. For affidavits involving subsequently discovered real property under W.S.

2-9-203

, the affidavit shall also include a copy of the judicial determination of the decedent’s heirs or right of descent. The county clerk shall index the affidavit in the name of the record owner and in the same manner as deeds are recorded.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 72, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-111.20; Laws 1995, ch. 158, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 206; 2020 ch. 71, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009,
deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “county clerk” in the first sentence of (a).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (c) added the second sentence.

Quoted in

Lon V. Smith Found. v. Devon Energy Corp., 2017 WY 121, 403 P.3d 997,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2017).